Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.080

Conflicting laws not applicable—Exemptions apply.

Any provisions of law which are in conflict with this chapter shall not be construed as applying to associations. Any exemptions under any laws applying to fishery products in the possession or under the control of the individual producer shall apply similarly and completely to such fishery products delivered by its members, in the possession or under the control of the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 8.]